Hawaii, session 2025, SB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302L-1.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The board shall consist of the following voting members: (1)  One voting member from the county of Hawaii; (2)  One voting member from the county of Maui; (3)  One voting member from the county of Kauai; (4)  Three voting members from the city and county of Honolulu; and (5)  Three at-large voting members. The superintendent of education, director of human services, director of health, [and] president of the [University] university of Hawaii, and head start state collaboration office director shall serve as ex officio, non-voting members of the board. The board shall invite the chief executive officer of Kamehameha Schools [and], the executive director of the Hawaii Association of Independent Schools, and president of the Head Start Association of Hawaii, or their designees, to serve as ex officio, non-voting members of the board." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST